Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.230

Application of RCW 42.56.380—Use of commercial information and records.

(1) Under RCW 42.56.380, certain agricultural business records, commission records, and department of agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.

(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to either the department or the commission for the purpose of administering this chapter may be shared between the department and the commission. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or administrative hearing involving this chapter.

(3) This section does not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of persons subject to this chapter as long as the statements do not identify the information furnished by any person; or

(b) The publication by the director or the commission of the name of any person violating this chapter and a statement of the manner of the violation by that person.

[ 2009 c 33 s 24.]